fr: Type d’ajustement de l’étui pour clavier musical: Ajustement sur mesure; Adapté à un modèle spécifique; Semi-universel (plage de tailles); Ajustement universel; Autre
de: Passformtyp des Keyboardkoffers: Maßgeschneidert; Modellspezifische Passform; Halbuniversell (Größenbereich); Universelle Passform; Sonstige
hu: Billentyűs hangszer tokjának illeszkedési típusa: Egyedi illeszkedésű; Modellspecifikus illeszkedésű; Félig univerzális (mérettartomány); Univerzális illeszkedésű; Egyéb
lt-LT: Klavišinio instrumento dėklo pritaikymo tipas: Individualus dydis; Pritaikytas konkrečiam modeliui; Pusiau universalus (dydžių intervalas); Universalus dydis; Kita
en: Musical keyboard case fit type: Custom fit; Model-specific fit; Semi-universal (size range); Universal fit; Other
it: Tipo di vestibilità della custodia per tastiera musicale: Su misura; Specifico per il modello; Semi-universale (gamma di dimensioni); Universale; Altro
th: เคสคีย์บอร์ดดนตรีแบบพอดีตัว: เข้ารูปพอดี; พอดีเฉพาะรุ่น; กึ่งอเนกประสงค์ (ช่วงขนาด); พอดีแบบอเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ dopasowania futerału na instrument klawiszowy: Dopasowanie na zamówienie; Dopasowanie do konkretnego modelu; Półuniwersalne (zakres rozmiarów); Uniwersalne dopasowanie; Inne
pt-BR: Capa para teclado musical tipo de ajuste: Sob medida; Específico para o modelo; Semiuniversal (faixa de tamanho); Universal; Outros
nl: Keyboard koffer pasvormtype: Op maat gemaakt; Modelspecifieke pasvorm; Semi-universeel (matenreeks); Universele pasvorm; Overig
el: Τύπος εφαρμογής θήκης μουσικού πληκτρολογίου: Εξατομικευμένη εφαρμογή; Εφαρμογή για συγκεκριμένο μοντέλο; Ημι-γενικής χρήσης (εύρος μεγεθών); Εφαρμογή γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
da: Pasform for kasse til musikkeyboard: Specialtilpasset form; Modelspecifik form; Semiuniversel (størrelsesinterval); Universel form; Andet
hr-HR: Glazbena klavijatura kutija odgovara tipu: Izrada po mjeri; Prilagođeno modelu; Poluuniverzalno (raspon veličina); Univerzalna veličina; Ostalo
es: Tipo de ajuste de la funda para teclado musical: Ajuste personalizado; Ajuste específico para el modelo; Semiuniversal (rango de tamaños); Ajuste universal; Otro
tr: Müzik klavyesi kılıf uyum tipi: Özel uyumlu; Modele özel uyumlu; Yarı evrensel (boyut aralığı); Evrensel uyumlu; Diğer
fi: Kosketinsoittimen laukun istuvuustyyppi: Mittatilaus; Mallikohtainen sovitus; Puoliyleinen (kokoalue); Yleiskoko; Muu
ja: ミュージカルキーボードケースフィットタイプ: カスタムフィット; モデル専用フィット; セミユニバーサル (サイズ範囲); ユニバーサルフィット; その他
vi: Loại hộp đựng đàn phím phù hợp: Kích thước tùy chỉnh; Kích thước theo dòng máy cụ thể; Bán đa năng (khoảng kích thước); Kích thước đa năng; Khác
ro-RO: Tip carcasă pentru claviatură muzicală: Potrivire personalizată; Potrivire specifică modelului; Semiuniversală (interval de mărimi); Potrivire universală; Altele
sk-SK: Typ puzdra na hudobné klávesy: Prispôsobený na mieru; Prispôsobený podľa modelu; Polouniverzálny (rozsah veľkostí); Univerzálny tvar; Iné
zh-CN: 电子琴琴包适配类型: 定制贴合; 特定型号贴合; 半通用（尺寸范围）; 通用贴合; 其他
zh-TW: 鍵盤樂器琴盒適配類型: 客製貼合; 特定型號貼合; 半通用 (尺寸範圍); 通用貼合; 其他
bg-BG: Тип съвместимост на калъф за музикална клавиатура: Персонализиран размер; Специфичен за модела размер; Полу-универсален (диапазон от размери); Универсален размер; Друго
pt-PT: Teclado musical caixa interior tipo fit: Ajuste personalizado; Ajuste específico do modelo; Semiuniversal (intervalo de tamanhos); Ajuste universal; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta prileganja kovčka za glasbene klaviature: Prileganje po meri; Prileganje za specifičen model; Poluniverzalno (razpon velikosti); Univerzalno prileganje; Drugo
sv: Passformsmodell för keyboardfodral: Specialanpassad passform; Modellspecifik passform; Semiuniversell (storleksintervall); Universell passform; Övrigt
ru: Тип посадки чехла для клавишного инструмента: Индивидуальная форма; Под конкретную модель; Полу-универсальный (диапазон размеров); Универсальный; Другое
cs: Typ přizpůsobení pouzdra pro hudební klávesnici: Střih na míru; Pro konkrétní model; Polouniverzální (rozsah velikostí); Univerzální velikost; Jiné
ko: 악기 키보드 케이스 핏 유형: 맞춤형 핏; 모델별 핏; 반범용형(사이즈 범위); 범용 핏; 기타
nb: Passformtype for keyboard-bag: Spesialtilpasset; Modellspesifikk passform; Halvuniversell (størrelsesspenn); Universell passform; Annet